Maine, session 132, LD1194.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. 23 MRSA c. 19, sub-c. 9 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 9
MAINE TRANSPORTATION FUND
§1861. Definitions
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Department. "Department" means the Department of Transportation.
2. Heavy duty vehicle. "Heavy duty vehicle" has the same meaning as in Title 29-A,
section 101, subsection 27-A.
3. Motor vehicle. "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in Title 29-A, section
101, subsection 42. "Motor vehicle" does not include a stock race car as defined in Title
29-A, section 101, subsection 72.
§1862. Maine Transportation Fund
1. Fund created. The Maine Transportation Fund, referred to in this section as "the
fund," is established as a nonlapsing fund within the department.
2. Use of funds. Money deposited into the fund must be used by the department for
the purposes set forth in section 1863, subsection 5. The funds allocated to the fund must
be transferred to:
A. Municipalities according to the requirements of Title 30-A, section 5681; and
B. The Highway Fund to be used for the purposes set forth in section 1863.
Page 1 - 132LR0594(01)

3. Source of the fund. Money deposited in the fund is revenue transferred into the
fund from the usage-based infrastructure fee collected pursuant to section 1863.
§1863. Usage-based infrastructure fee
Beginning on July 1, 2027, the department shall collect usage-based infrastructure fees
pursuant to this chapter.
1. Annual mileage. The department shall maintain a record of the annual mileage of
a motor vehicle for the purposes of collecting a usage-based infrastructure fee for a motor
vehicle registered in this State. The annual mileage may be submitted to the department by
the owner of the motor vehicle through a digital reporting system or to the department
during a motor vehicle inspection as required under Title 29-A, chapter 15.
The department shall create a digital reporting system for an owner of a motor vehicle to
report annual mileage for the purposes of calculating the usage-based infrastructure fee
pursuant to subsection 2.
2. Calculation of usage-based infrastructure fee. A motor vehicle is subject to a
usage-based infrastructure fee. The usage-based infrastructure fee is the sum of the annual
mileage multiplied by:
A. For a motor vehicle used for transportation of passengers, one cent; or
B. For a heavy duty vehicle, 1 1/2 cent.
3. Electric and hybrid motor vehicles. Notwithstanding subsection 2, an electric or
a hybrid motor vehicle is subject to a flat annual fee equivalent to the average usage-based
infrastructure fee for a motor vehicle.
4. Exemptions. The following motor vehicle owners are exempt from the usage-based
infrastructure fee for the first 10,000 miles driven each year:
A. A person who is 65 years of age or older; or
B. A person who resides in a household with an annual income of under $40,000.
5. Use of fees. The revenue collected from the usage-based infrastructure fee pursuant
to subsections 2 and 3 and deposited into the Maine Transportation Fund established under
section 1862 must be used to ensure municipalities receive at least an equivalent revenue
to the revenue collected from excise taxes to finance road maintenance and repair, bridge
maintenance and repair and transportation infrastructure projects.
6. Audit and compliance. Beginning July 1, 2028, the State Auditor shall submit a
biennial audit report on the financial and operational impact of the usage-based
infrastructure fee to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
transportation matters. The report must include an evaluation of municipal funding to
ensure municipalities receive at least an equivalent revenue through usage-based
infrastructure fees as that received from excise taxes.
7. Progress report. By January 1, 2028 and each year thereafter, the department shall
submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
transportation matters. The committee is authorized to submit legislation related to the
report. The report must include:
A. Findings and recommendations regarding compliance with this section;
Page 2 - 132LR0594(01)

B. Findings and recommendations regarding the effectiveness and equity of this
section; and
C. An overview of the costs associated with the transition to and administration of the
usage-based infrastructure fee.
Sec. A-2. 36 MRSA §1482, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2013, c. 263, §1, is
further amended to read:
C. For the privilege of operating a motor vehicle or camper trailer on the public ways,
each motor vehicle, other than a stock race car, or each camper trailer to be so operated
is subject to excise tax as follows, except as specified in subparagraph (3), (4) or (5):
a sum equal to 24 mills on each dollar of the maker's list price for the first or current
year of model, 17 1/2 mills for the 2nd year, 13 1/2 mills for the 3rd year, 10 mills for
the 4th year, 6 1/2 mills for the 5th year and 4 mills for the 6th and succeeding years.
The minimum tax is $5 for a motor vehicle other than a bicycle with motor attached,
$2.50 for a bicycle with motor attached, $15 for a camper trailer other than a tent trailer
and $5 for a tent trailer. The excise tax on a stock race car is $5. Beginning July 1,
2025 and each July 1st for the next 4 years, each amount specified in this paragraph is
reduced by 20% of the original amount for each year until the amount equals zero after
the final reduction on July 1, 2029.
(1) On new registrations of automobiles New automobiles, trucks and truck
tractors, the excise tax payment must be made prior to registration and is for a one-
year period from the date of registration purchased from a motor vehicle dealer
licensed in any state for the sale of new motor vehicles are exempt from the excise
tax under this section beginning July 1, 2025.
(2) Vehicles registered under the International Registration Plan are subject to an
excise tax determined on a monthly proration basis if their registration period is
less than 12 months.
(3) For commercial vehicles manufactured in model year 1996 and after, the
amount of excise tax due for trucks or truck tractors registered for more than 26,000
pounds and for Class A special mobile equipment, as defined in Title 29‑A, section
101, subsection 70, is based on the purchase price in the original year of title rather
than on the list price. Verification of purchase price for the application of excise
tax is determined by the initial bill of sale or the state sales tax document provided
at point of purchase. The initial bill of sale is that issued by the dealer to the initial
purchaser of a new vehicle.
(4) For buses manufactured in model year 2006 and after, the amount of excise
tax due is based on the purchase price in the original year of title rather than on the
list price. Verification of purchase price for the application of excise tax is
determined by the initial bill of sale or the state sales tax document provided at
point of purchase. The initial bill of sale is that issued by the dealer to the initial
purchaser of a new vehicle.
(5) For trucks or truck tractors registered for more than 26,000 pounds that have
been reconstructed using a prepackaged kit that may include a frame, front axle or
body but does not include a power train or engine and for which a new certificate
Page 3 - 132LR0594(01)

414 of title is required to be issued, the amount of excise tax due is based on the maker's
425 list price of the prepackaged kit.
For motor vehicles being registered pursuant to Title 29‑A, section 405, subsection 1,
paragraph C, the excise tax must be prorated for the number of months in the
registration.
Sec. A-3. Reports. By January 1, 2026, the Department of Transportation shall
submit a plan to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
transportation matters that outlines how the usage-based infrastructure fee under the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 23, chapter 19, subchapter 9 will be implemented statewide
beginning on July 1, 2027. The committee is authorized to submit legislation related to the
plan.
By January 1, 2035, the department shall submit a report to the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over transportation matters. The report
must include findings and recommendations regarding the compliance, effectiveness and
equity of the usage-based infrastructure fee pursuant to Title 23, section 1863. The
department may also consider whether the creation of a 0.5% luxury goods sales tax is
needed to supplement the cost of administering the usage-based infrastructure fee. The
committee is authorized to submit legislation related to the report.
PART B
Sec. B-1. 29-A MRSA §409, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2017, c. 67, §2, is further
amended to read:
5. Other taxes. A motor vehicle, mobile home or camp trailer may not be registered
until the excise tax or personal property tax or real estate tax has been paid in accordance
with Title 36, sections 551, 602, 1482 and 1484. The Secretary of State may provide
municipal excise tax collectors with a standard vehicle registration form for the collection
of excise tax.
Sec. B-2. 29-A MRSA §523, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 634, §8, is further
amended to read:
2. Disabled veterans; special free license plates. The Secretary of State, on
application and upon evidence of payment of the excise tax required by Title 36, section
1482 or upon evidence of exemption from excise tax under Title 36, section 1483,
subsection 12, shall issue, with no annual registration fee, a registration certificate and upon
request special designating plates to be used in lieu of regular registration plates for a
vehicle with a registered gross weight of not more than 26,000 pounds to any 100%
disabled veteran when that application is accompanied by certification from the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs or any branch of the United States Armed Forces as
to the veteran's permanent disability and receipt of 100% service-connected benefits. Upon
request a disability placard may be issued at no fee. The Secretary of State may issue a
registration certificate and special designating plates for more than one vehicle owned by
a veteran eligible under this subsection.
These special designating plates must bear the words "Disabled Veteran," which indicate
that the vehicle is owned by a disabled veteran.
Sec. B-3. 29-A MRSA §1771 is enacted to read:
Page 4 - 132LR0594(01)

§1771. Annual mileage reporting
1. Submission of annual mileage. A certified inspection mechanic may submit the
annual mileage of a motor vehicle to the department to be used for the calculation of the
usage-based infrastructure fee established in Title 23, section 1863.
2. Accurate reporting. The department shall ensure the accurate reporting of annual
mileage pursuant to Title 23, section 1863, subsection 1.
Sec. B-4. 36 MRSA §1482, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2013, c. 263, §2, is further
amended to read:
4. Maker's list price. The maker's list price of a vehicle to be used must be obtained
from sources approved by the State Tax Assessor, except for a truck or truck tractor
described under subsection 1, paragraph C, subparagraph (5) (3). When the maker's list
price of a vehicle is not readily obtainable the State Tax Assessor shall prescribe the maker's
list price to be used or the manner in which the maker's list price is determined.
A. At the time of payment of the excise tax prior to a new registration for a new
passenger vehicle purchased from a motor vehicle dealer licensed in any state for the
sale of new passenger vehicles, the owner shall submit the manufacturer's suggested
retail price sticker, or a copy of the sticker, to the excise tax collector. In the case of
rental and fleet vehicles, other documentation may be provided at the discretion of the
municipal excise tax collector.
This paragraph applies only to those vehicles for which a manufacturer's suggested
retail price sticker is required by the Federal Government.
Sec. B-5. 36 MRSA §1483, as amended by PL 2023, c. 565, §1 and c. 646, Pt. A,
§45, is further amended to read:
§1483. Exemptions
The following are exempt from the excise tax:
1. State vehicles. Vehicles owned by this State or by political subdivisions of the
State;
2. Driver education. Motor vehicles registered by municipalities for use in driver
education in the secondary schools or by private secondary schools for use in driver
education in those schools;
3. Volunteer fire departments. Motor vehicles owned by volunteer fire departments;
4. Dealers or manufacturers. Vehicles owned by bona fide dealers or manufacturers
of the vehicles that are held solely for demonstration and sale and constitute stock in trade;
5. Transporter registration. Vehicles to be lawfully operated on transporter
registration certificates;
6. Railroads. Vehicles owned by railroad companies that are subject to the excise tax
imposed under chapter 361;
7. Benevolent and charitable institutions. Vehicles owned and used solely for their
own purposes by benevolent and charitable institutions entitled to exemption from property
tax under section 652, subsection 1;
Page 5 - 132LR0594(01)

8. Literary and scientific institutions. Vehicles owned and used solely for their own
purposes by literary and scientific institutions that are entitled to exemption from property
tax under section 652, subsection 1;
9. Religious societies. Vehicles owned and used solely for their own purposes by
houses of religious worship or religious societies that are entitled to exemption from
property tax under section 652, subsection 1, paragraph G;
10. Certain nonresidents. Motor vehicles permitted to operate without Maine
registration under Title 29‑A, section 109;
11. Interstate commerce. Vehicles traveling in the State only in interstate commerce
that are owned in a state where an excise or property tax has been paid on the vehicle and
that grants to Maine-owned vehicles the exemption provided in this subsection;
12. Certain veterans. Automobiles owned by veterans who are granted free
registration of those vehicles by the Secretary of State under Title 29‑A, section 523,
subsection 1 or who are disabled by injury or disease incurred or aggravated during active
military service in the line of duty and are receiving any form of pension or compensation
from the United States Government for total, service-connected disability;
13. Certain buses. Buses used for the transportation of passengers for hire in interstate
or intrastate commerce, or both, by carriers engaged in furnishing common carrier
passenger service. At the option of the appropriate municipality, those buses may be
subject to the excise tax provided in section 1482;
14. Antique and experimental aircraft. Antique and experimental aircraft as defined
in Title 6, section 3, subsections 10‑A and 18‑E that are registered in accordance with the
provisions of Title 6; and
15. Adaptive equipment. Adaptive equipment installed on a motor vehicle owned by
a disabled person or the family of a disabled person or by a carrier engaged in furnishing
passenger service for hire to make that vehicle operable or accessible by a disabled person;
and.
16. Active military. Vehicles owned, including those jointly owned with a spouse,
by a person on active duty serving in the Armed Forces of the United States who is
permanently stationed at a military or naval post, station or base in the State or outside the
State or who is deployed for military service for a period of more than 180 days or was
deployed for a period of at least 180 consecutive days, a portion or all of which occurred
in the 12 months preceding the request for an exemption from excise tax, and who did not
previously receive an exemption for that deployment. Joint ownership of the vehicle must
be indicated in the vehicle's title documentation. A member of the Armed Forces of the
United States, or that member's spouse, who desires to register that member's vehicle in
this State pursuant to this subsection shall present documentation of the member's
eligibility from the commander of the member's post, station or base, or from the
commander's designated agent. For purposes of this subsection, "person on active duty
serving in the Armed Forces of the United States" includes a member of the National Guard
or the Reserves of the United States Armed Forces as long as the person satisfies the service
requirements of this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, "deployed for military
service" has the same meaning as in Title 26, section 814, subsection 1, paragraph A.
Page 6 - 132LR0594(01)

Sec. B-6. 36 MRSA §1484, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2007, c. 627, §33 and by
PL 2015, c. 98, §1 and affected by §2, is repealed.
Sec. B-7. 36 MRSA §2909, first ¶, as amended by PL 2009, c. 598, §47, is further
amended to read:
A person engaged in furnishing common carrier passenger service is entitled to
reimbursement of the tax paid on internal combustion engine fuel used by that person in
locally encouraged vehicles. For purposes of calculating reimbursement due pursuant to
this section, internal combustion engine fuel used in a person's locally encouraged vehicles
is presumed to bear the same proportional relationship to internal combustion engine fuel
used in all of the person's passenger vehicles that the person's commutation fare revenue
derived from service provided by locally encouraged vehicles bears to the person's total
passenger fare revenue. "Commutation fare revenue" means revenue attributable to fares
of 60¢ or less and fares paid for commutation or season tickets for single trips of less than
30 miles or for commutation tickets for one month or less. "Total passenger fare revenue"
means all revenue attributable to the claimant's passenger operations. "Locally encouraged
vehicles" means buses upon which no excise tax is collected under section 1483, subsection
13 used for the transportation of passengers for hire in interstate or intrastate commerce, or
both, by carriers engaged in furnishing common carrier passenger service.
Sec. B-8. 36 MRSA §3215, first ¶, as amended by PL 2009, c. 598, §48, is further
amended to read:
A person engaged in furnishing common carrier passenger service is entitled to
reimbursement of the tax paid on special fuel used by that person in locally encouraged
vehicles. For purposes of calculating reimbursement due pursuant to this section, special
fuel used in a person's locally encouraged vehicles is presumed to bear the same
proportional relationship to special fuel used in all of the person's passenger vehicles that
the person's commutation fare revenue derived from service provided by locally
encouraged vehicles bears to the person's total passenger fare revenue. "Commutation fare
revenue" means revenue attributable to fares of 60¢ or less and fares paid for commutation
or season tickets for single trips of less than 30 miles or for commutation tickets for one
month or less. "Total passenger fare revenue" means all revenue attributable to the
claimant's passenger operations. "Locally encouraged vehicles" means buses upon which
no excise tax is collected under section 1483, subsection 13 used for the transportation of
passengers for hire in interstate or intrastate commerce, or both, by carriers engaged in
furnishing common carrier passenger service.
Sec. B-9. Effective date. This Part takes effect July 1, 2030.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved, except as otherwise indicated.